Colorado, session 2026A, SB046.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-1-104.6, amend
(7)(b)(II) as follows:
39-1-104.6. Qualified-senior primary residence real property -
valuation for assessment - reimbursement to local governments for
reduced valuation - temporary mechanism for refunding excess state
revenues - legislative declaration - definitions.
(7) Notice of classification - appeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) (II) An individual who has not timely filed an application with
the assessor by March 15 JULY 15 may file a late application no later than
the July 15 AUGUST 15 that immediately follows that deadline. The assessor
shall accept any such application but may not accept any late application
filed after July 15 AUGUST 15. A decision of an assessor to disallow the
filing of a late application after July 15 AUGUST 15 or to grant or deny the
classification to an applicant who has filed a late application after March 15
but no later than July 15 BUT NO LATER THAN AUGUST 15 is final, and an
applicant who is denied late filing or classification of property as
qualified-senior primary residence real property may not contest the denial.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-1-111, amend (2)
as follows:
39-1-111. Taxes levied by board of county commissioners.
(2) As soon as such levies have been made, the board of county
commissioners, or other body authorized by law to levy taxes, or either
group's authorized party shall forthwith certify all such levies to the
assessor, upon forms prescribed by the administrator, and shall transmit a
copy of such certification to the administrator, to the division of local
government, and to the department of education, IN AN ELECTRONIC OR
PAPER FORMAT.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-1-113, amend (1.5),
(2), and (3) as follows:
39-1-113. Abatement and refund of taxes.
(1.5) Upon authorization by the board of county commissioners, the
assessor may review petitions for abatement or refund and settle by written
mutual agreement any such petition for abatement or refund in an amount
of ten TWENTY thousand dollars or less per tract, parcel, or lot of land or per
schedule of personal property. Any abatement or refund agreed upon and
settled pursuant to this subsection (1.5) shall not be subject to the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(2) (a) Whenever any abatement or refund in an amount of ten
TWENTY thousand dollars or less is recommended by the board of county
commissioners, the board shall order the abatement of taxes pro rata for all
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-046

levies applicable to such property, or, in the case of a refund, the board shall
order the refund of taxes pro rata by all jurisdictions receiving payment
thereof.
(b) Whenever any abatement or refund in an amount of ten TWENTY
thousand dollars or less has been agreed upon and settled by the assessor
pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section, the assessor shall order the
abatement of taxes pro rata for all levies applicable to such property, or, in
the case of a refund, the assessor shall order the refund of taxes pro rata by
all jurisdictions receiving payment thereof.
(3) Whenever any abatement or refund in an amount in excess of ten
TWENTY thousand dollars is recommended by the board of county
commissioners, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT two copies ONE COPY of an
application therefor FOR ABATEMENT OR REFUND IN AN ELECTRONIC OR
PAPER FORMAT, reciting the amount of such abatement or refund and the
grounds upon which it should be allowed, shall be submitted to the
administrator for review pursuant to section 39-2-116; EXCEPT THAT, THE
BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS IS NOT REQUIRED TO SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION TO THE ADMINISTRATOR IN THE CASE OF AN ABATEMENT OR
REFUND CAUSED BY A VALUATION CHANGE TO ENSURE MATCHING VALUES
WITHIN THE SAME REASSESSMENT CYCLE. If an application is approved, the
board of county commissioners shall order the abatement of taxes pro rata
for all levies applicable to such property, or, in the case of a refund, the
board of county commissioners shall order the refund of taxes pro rata by
all jurisdictions receiving payment thereof.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-2-109, amend (1)(e)
and (1)(k); repeal (2); and add (1)(n) as follows:
39-2-109. Duties, powers, and authority.
(1) It is the duty of the property tax administrator, and the
administrator shall have and exercise authority:
(e) To prepare and publish from time to time manuals, appraisal
procedures, and instructions, after consultation with the advisory committee
to the property tax administrator and the approval of the state board of
equalization, concerning methods of appraising and valuing land,
improvements, personal property, and mobile homes, and to require their
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-046

utilization by assessors in valuing and assessing taxable property. Said
manuals, appraisal procedures, and instructions shall MUST be based upon
the three approaches to appraisal and the procedures set forth in section
39-1-103 (5)(a). Such manuals, appraisal procedures, and instructions shall
be ARE subject to legislative review, the same as rules, pursuant to section
24-4-103 (8)(d). Beginning January 1, 2023, the administrator shall comply
with subsection (2) of this section when modifying the manuals, appraisal
procedures, and instructions.
(k) To prepare and publish guidelines, after consultation with the
advisory committee to the property tax administrator and approval of the
state board of equalization, concerning the audit and compliance review of
oil and gas leasehold properties for property tax purposes, which shall MUST
be utilized by assessors, treasurers, and their agents. Such guidelines shall
be ARE subject to legislative review, the same as rules, pursuant to section
24-4-103 (8)(d). Beginning January 1, 2023, the administrator shall comply
with subsection (2) of this section when modifying the guidelines.
(n) TO PREPARE AND PUBLISH STANDARDIZED FORMS, INCLUDING A
LETTER OF AUTHORIZATION, FOR ALL LEVELS OF PROPERTY TAX APPEALS
AND TO DEVELOP AND PUBLISH GUIDELINES OR INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE USE
OF THE FORMS. ACCORDING TO THE GUIDELINES OR INSTRUCTIONS
PUBLISHED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR, NOTARIZATION OF THE FORMS IS NOT
REQUIRED SO ALONG AS ALTERNATIVE INDICIA OF RELIABILITY AND
AUTHENTICITY ARE AVAILABLE.
(2) (a) As used in this subsection (2), "property tax materials" means
the manuals, appraisal procedures, instructions, and guidelines that the
administrator prepares and publishes under the authority conferred by
subsections (1)(e) and (1)(k) of this section.
(b) Prior to proposing any changes to the property tax materials, the
administrator shall conduct a public hearing described in subsection (2)(d)
of this section. No less than two weeks prior to the hearing, the
administrator shall publish notice of the proposed changes to the property
tax materials. The administrator must include in the notice:
(I) The date, time, and place of the hearing; and
(II) Either the terms or substance of the proposed change or a
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-046

description of the subjects and issues involved.
(c) The administrator shall maintain a list of all persons who request
notification of proposed changes to the property tax materials. On or before
the date of the publication of notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this
section, the administrator shall provide notice via email of the proposed
changes to all persons on the list. The administrator shall not charge a fee
for sending this email notice. Upon request of a person on the list, the
administrator may mail the notice to the person. Any person on the list who
requests to receive a copy of the proposed changes by mail must pay a fee
to the administrator that is set based upon the administrator's actual cost of
copying and mailing the proposed changes to the person. All fees collected
by the administrator are continuously appropriated to the administrator
solely for the purpose of defraying the cost of the notice.
(d) At the place and time stated in the notice, the administrator shall
hold a public hearing at which the administrator shall afford interested
persons an opportunity to submit written data, views, or arguments and to
present the same orally unless the administrator deems it unnecessary. The
administrator shall consider all submissions when finalizing a proposed
change to the property tax materials that the administrator submits to the
advisory committee to the property tax administrator for the advisory
committee's review in accordance with section 39-2-131 (1).
(e) The administrator shall adopt proposed changes to the property
tax materials consistent with the subject matter as set forth in the notice
required by subsection (2)(b) of this section prior to consideration by the
advisory committee to the property tax administrator.
(f) Any interested person shall have the right to petition the
administrator in writing for the issuance, amendment, or repeal of any
property tax materials. The petition is open to public inspection. The
administrator is not required to take any action based on a petition, but
when the administrator proposes a change to the property tax materials, the
administrator shall consider all related written petitions.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-2-115, amend (1)(a)
as follows:
39-2-115. Review of abstracts of assessment - recommendations
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-046

- repeal.
(1) (a) No later than August 25 of each year, each county assessor
shall file with the property tax administrator two copies ONE COPY of an
abstract of assessment of the county IN AN ELECTRONIC OR PAPER FORMAT.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-2-125, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(c) as follows:
39-2-125. Duties of the board - board of assessment appeals cash
fund - creation - accelerated appeal cash fund - repeal.
(1) The board of assessment appeals shall perform the following
duties, such performance to be in accordance with the applicable provisions
of article 4 of title 24: C.R.S.
(c) Hear appeals from decisions of county boards of equalization
filed not NO later than THE LATER OF:
(I) SEPTEMBER 1;
(II) DECEMBER 1, IN A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST
AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7; OR
(III) Thirty days after the entry of any such THE decision, IF THE
TAXPAYER WAS NOTIFIED OUTSIDE OF THE REGULAR NOTIFICATION
SCHEDULE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-5-121;
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-2-131, amend
(3)(b) as follows:
39-2-131. Function of the committee - notice of proposed
changes - property tax materials - definition.
(3) (b) As used in this subsection (3), "property tax materials" has
the same meaning as set forth in section 39-2-109 (2)(a) MEANS THE
MANUALS, APPRAISAL PROCEDURES, INSTRUCTIONS, AND GUIDELINES THAT
THE ADMINISTRATOR PREPARES AND PUBLISHES UNDER THE AUTHORITY
CONFERRED BY SECTIONS 39-2-109 (1)(e) AND (1)(k) OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-046

SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-3-205, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
39-3-205. Exemption applications - penalty for providing false
information - confidentiality.
(1) (b) To claim the exemption allowed by section 39-3-203 (1.5),
an individual shall file with the assessor a completed exemption application
and proof of qualifying veteran with a disability status no later than July 1
JULY 15 of the first property tax year for which the exemption is claimed.
An application returned by mail shall be deemed filed on the date it is
postmarked. An individual who filed an exemption application with the
division rather than with the assessor as was required before this subsection
(1)(b) was amended by Senate Bill 23-036, enacted in 2023, and who
qualified for and received an exemption for a property tax year commencing
before January 1, 2024, retains the exemption and is not required to submit
a new application or proof of qualifying veteran with a disability status to
the assessor.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-3-206, amend
(2)(a.7) as follows:
39-3-206. Notice to individuals returning incomplete or
nonqualifying exemption applications - denial of exemption -
administrative remedies.
(2) (a.7) An individual who wishes to claim the exemption for
qualifying veterans with a disability allowed by section 39-3-203 (1.5), but
who has not timely filed an exemption application, may request that the
assessor waive the application deadline and allow the individual to file a
late exemption application no later than the August 1 AUGUST 15 that
immediately follows the original application deadline. The assessor may
accept an application if, in the assessor's sole discretion, the applicant
shows good cause for not timely filing an application. If the assessor
accepts a late application, the assessor shall determine whether the
application should be granted or denied pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this
section and shall mail notice of its determination to the applicant no later
than the August 25 that immediately follows the late application deadline.
A decision of the assessor to allow or disallow the filing of a late
application or of an assessor to grant or deny an exemption to an applicant
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-046

who has filed a late application is final, and an applicant who is denied late
filing or an exemption may not contest the denial.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-5-121, amend
(1)(a)(I), (1.5)(a)(I), and (4)(a); and add (1.5)(a)(III) as follows:
39-5-121. Notice of valuation - legislative declaration - definition
- repeal.
(1) (a) (I) No later than May 1 in each year, the assessor shall mail
to each person who owns land or improvements a notice setting forth the
valuation of such land or improvements. For agricultural property, the
notice must separately state the actual value of such land or improvements
in the previous year, the actual value in the current year, and the amount of
any adjustment in actual value. For all other property, the notice must state
the total actual value of such land and improvements together in the
previous year, the total actual value in the current year, and the amount of
any adjustment in total actual value. The notice must not state the valuation
for assessment of such land or improvements or combination of land and
improvements. Based upon the classification of such taxable property, the
notice must also set forth the appropriate ratio of valuation for assessment
to be applied to said actual value prior to the calculation of property taxes
for the current year and that any change or adjustment of the ratio of
valuation for assessment must DOES not constitute grounds for the protest
or abatement of taxes. The notice must state, in bold-faced type, that the
taxpayer has the right to protest any adjustment in valuation, the
classification of the property that determines the assessment percentage to
be applied, and the dates and places at which the assessor will hear such
protest. The notice must also set forth the following: That, to preserve the
taxpayer's right to protest, the taxpayer shall notify the assessor either in
writing or in person of the taxpayer's objection and protest; that such notice
must be delivered, postmarked, or given in person no later than June 8 JUNE
1; and that, after such date, the taxpayer's right to object and protest the
adjustment in valuation is lost. The notice must be mailed together with a
form that, if completed by the taxpayer, allows the taxpayer to explain the
basis for the taxpayer's valuation of the property. Such form may be
completed by the taxpayer to initiate an appeal of the assessor's valuation.
However, in accordance with section 39-5-122 (2), completion of this form
does not constitute the exclusive means of appealing the assessor's
valuation. For the years that intervene between changes in the level of
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-046

value, if the difference between the actual value of such land or
improvements in the previous year and the actual value of such land or
improvements in the intervening year as set forth in such notice constitutes
an increase in actual value of more than seventy-five percent, the assessor
shall mail together with the notice an explanation of the reasons for such
increase in actual value.
(1.5) (a) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(III) OF
THIS SECTION FOR A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST AND
APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7, no later than June
15 each year, the assessor shall mail to each person who owns taxable
personal property a notice setting forth the valuation of the personal
property. The notice must state the actual value of such personal property
in the previous year, the actual value in the current year, and the amount of
any adjustment in actual value. The notice must not state the valuation for
assessment of the personal property. The notice must also set forth the ratio
of valuation for assessment to be applied to said actual value prior to the
calculation of property taxes for the current year. With the approval of the
board of county commissioners, the assessor may include in the notice an
estimate of the taxes owed for the current property tax year. If such an
estimate is included, the notice must clearly state that the tax amount is
merely an estimate based upon the best available information. The notice
must state, in bold-faced type, that the taxpayer has the right to protest any
adjustment in valuation but not the estimate of taxes if such an estimate is
included in the notice, and the dates and places at which the assessor will
hear protests. The notice must also set forth the following: To preserve the
taxpayer's right to protest, the taxpayer shall notify the assessor either by
mail or in person of the taxpayer's objection and protest; that the notice
must be postmarked or physically delivered no later than June 30; and that,
after such date, the taxpayer's right to object and protest the adjustment in
valuation is lost. The notice must be mailed together with a form that, if
completed by the taxpayer, allows the taxpayer to explain the basis for the
taxpayer's valuation of the property. The form may be completed by the
taxpayer to initiate an appeal of the assessor's valuation. However, in
accordance with section 39-5-122 (2), completion of this form does not
constitute the exclusive means of appealing the assessor's valuation.
(III) FOR A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST AND APPEAL
PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7, NO LATER THAN JULY 15
EACH YEAR, THE ASSESSOR SHALL MAIL TO EACH PERSON WHO OWNS
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-046

TAXABLE PERSONAL PROPERTY A NOTICE SETTING FORTH THE VALUATION OF
THE PERSONAL PROPERTY. THE NOTICE MUST STATE THE ACTUAL VALUE OF
SUCH PERSONAL PROPERTY IN THE PREVIOUS YEAR, THE ACTUAL VALUE IN
THE CURRENT YEAR, AND THE AMOUNT OF ANY ADJUSTMENT IN ACTUAL
VALUE. THE NOTICE MUST NOT STATE THE VALUATION FOR ASSESSMENT OF
THE PERSONAL PROPERTY. THE NOTICE MUST ALSO SET FORTH THE RATIO OF
VALUATION FOR ASSESSMENT TO BE APPLIED TO SAID ACTUAL VALUE PRIOR
TO THE CALCULATION OF PROPERTY TAXES FOR THE CURRENT YEAR. WITH
THE APPROVAL OF THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS, THE ASSESSOR
MAY INCLUDE IN THE NOTICE AN ESTIMATE OF THE TAXES OWED FOR THE
CURRENT PROPERTY TAX YEAR. IF SUCH AN ESTIMATE IS INCLUDED, THE
NOTICE MUST CLEARLY STATE THAT THE TAX AMOUNT IS MERELY AN
ESTIMATE BASED UPON THE BEST AVAILABLE INFORMATION. THE NOTICE
MUST STATE, IN BOLD-FACE TYPE, THAT THE TAXPAYER HAS THE RIGHT TO
PROTEST ANY ADJUSTMENT IN VALUATION BUT NOT THE ESTIMATE OF TAXES
IF SUCH AN ESTIMATE IS INCLUDED IN THE NOTICE, AND THE DATES AND
PLACES AT WHICH THE ASSESSOR WILL HEAR PROTESTS. THE NOTICE MUST
ALSO SET FORTH THE FOLLOWING: TO PRESERVE THE TAXPAYER'S RIGHT TO
PROTEST, THE TAXPAYER SHALL NOTIFY THE ASSESSOR EITHER BY MAIL OR
IN PERSON OF THE TAXPAYER'S OBJECTION AND PROTEST; THAT THE NOTICE
MUST BE POSTMARKED OR PHYSICALLY DELIVERED NO LATER THAN JULY 31;
AND THAT, AFTER SAID DATE, THE TAXPAYER'S RIGHT TO OBJECT AND
PROTEST THE ADJUSTMENT IN VALUATION IS LOST. THE NOTICE MUST BE
MAILED TOGETHER WITH A FORM THAT, IF COMPLETED BY THE TAXPAYER,
ALLOWS THE TAXPAYER TO EXPLAIN THE BASIS FOR THE TAXPAYER'S
VALUATION OF THE PROPERTY. THE FORM MAY BE COMPLETED BY THE
TAXPAYER TO INITIATE AN APPEAL OF THE ASSESSOR'S VALUATION.
HOWEVER, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-5-122 (2), COMPLETION OF
THIS FORM DOES NOT CONSTITUTE THE EXCLUSIVE MEANS OF APPEALING THE
ASSESSOR'S VALUATION.
(4) (a) Any notice of valuation required by subsections (1) and (1.5)
of this section sent to the owner of any real property must include the
following statement: "If a property owner does not timely object to their
property's valuation by June 8 JUNE 1 under section 39-5-122, C.R.S., they
may file a request for an abatement under section 39-10-114 C.R.S., by
contacting the county assessor."
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-5-122, amend
(1)(a), (2), and (4) as follows:
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-046

39-5-122. Taxpayer's remedies to correct errors.
(1) (a) On or before May 1 of each year, the assessor shall give
public notice in at least one issue of a newspaper published in the assessor's
county that, beginning on the first working day after notices of adjusted
valuation are mailed to taxpayers, the assessor will sit to hear all objections
and protests concerning valuations of taxable real property determined by
the assessor for the current year; that, for a taxpayer's objection and protest
to be heard, notice must be given to the assessor; and that such notice must
be postmarked, delivered, or given in person by June 8 JUNE 1. The notice
must also state that objections and protests concerning valuations of taxable
personal property determined by the assessor for the current year will be
heard commencing June 15; that, for a taxpayer's objection and protest to
be heard, notice must be given to the assessor; and that such notice must be
postmarked or physically delivered by June 30 OR, FOR A COUNTY THAT
USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 39-5-122.7, BY JULY 31. If there is no such newspaper, then such
notice must be conspicuously posted in the offices of the assessor, the
treasurer, and the county clerk and recorder and in at least two other public
places in the county seat. The assessor shall send news releases containing
such notice to radio stations, television stations, and newspapers of general
circulation in the county.
(2) If any person is of the opinion that the person's property has been
valued too high, has been twice valued, or is exempt by law from taxation
or that property has been erroneously assessed to such person, the person
may appear before the assessor and object, complete the form mailed with
the person's notice of valuation pursuant to section 39-5-121 (1) or (1.5), or
file a written letter of objection and protest by mail with the assessor's office
before the last day specified in the notice, stating in general terms the reason
for the objection and protest. Reasons for the objection and protest may
include, but shall not be limited to, the installation and operation of surface
equipment relating to oil and gas wells on agricultural land. Any change or
adjustment of any ratio of valuation for assessment shall not constitute
grounds for an objection. If the form initiating an appeal or the written letter
of objection and protest is filed by mail, it shall be presumed that it was
received as of the day it was postmarked. If the form initiating an appeal or
the written letter of objection and protest is hand-delivered, the date it was
received by the assessor shall be stamped on the form or letter. As stated in
the public notice given by the assessor pursuant to subsection (1) of this
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-046

section, the taxpayer's notification to the assessor of the taxpayer's objection
and protest to the adjustment in valuation must be delivered, postmarked,
or given in person by June 8 JUNE 1 in the case of real property. In the case
of personal property, the notice must be postmarked or physically delivered
by June 30; EXCEPT THAT, FOR A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE
PROTEST AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7, THE
NOTICE MUST BE POSTMARKED OR PHYSICALLY DELIVERED BY JULY 31. All
such forms and letters received from protesters shall be presumed to be on
time unless the assessor can present evidence to show otherwise. The
county shall not prescribe the written form of objection and protest to be
used. The protester shall have the opportunity on the days specified in the
public notice to present the protester's objection in writing or protest in
person and be heard, whether or not there has been a change in valuation of
such property from the previous year and whether or not any change is the
result of a determination by the assessor for the current year or by the state
board of equalization for the previous year. If the assessor finds any
valuation to be erroneous or otherwise improper, the assessor shall correct
the error. If the assessor declines to change any valuation that the assessor
has determined, the assessor shall provide reasons in writing on the form
described in section 39-8-106, shall insert the information otherwise
required by the form, and shall mail two copies ONE COPY of the completed
form to the person presenting the objection and protest so denied on or
before the last regular working day of the assessor in June in the case of real
property and on or before July 10 in the case of personal property; except
that, if a county uses an alternate protest and appeal procedure pursuant to
section 39-5-122.7, the assessor shall mail the copies on or before August
15 in the case of both real and personal property.
(4) The assessor shall continue the assessor's hearings from day to
day until all objections and protests have been heard, but all such hearings
must be concluded by June 8 JUNE 1 in the case of real property and July 5
JUNE 30 in the case of personal property; EXCEPT THAT, FOR A COUNTY THAT
USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 39-5-122.7, THE HEARINGS MUST BE CONCLUDED BY JULY 31 IN THE
CASE OF PERSONAL PROPERTY.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-5-122.7, amend
(1) and (4) as follows:
39-5-122.7. Alternate protest and appeal procedure for specified
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-046

counties.
(1) The governing body of any county may, at the request of the
assessor, elect to use an alternate protest and appeal procedure to determine
objections and protests concerning valuations of taxable REAL OR PERSONAL
property. The election shall MUST not be made unless the assessor has
requested the use of the alternative protest and appeal procedure. The
election shall MUST be made on or before May 1 of each year and shall be
IS effective for all objections and protests concerning valuations of taxable
REAL OR PERSONAL property for the year. The governing body of the county
shall provide notice of the election to the board of assessment appeals and
to the district court in such county.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, beginning
January 1, 2024, counties with a population greater than three hundred
thousand, as determined pursuant to the most recently published population
estimates from the state demographer appointed by the executive director
of the department of local affairs, shall in any year of general reassessment
of real property that is valued biennially by an assessor pursuant to section
39-1-104 (10.2) use an alternative protest and appeal procedure to
determine objections and protests concerning valuations of taxable REAL
property. When following an alternative protest and appeal procedure
pursuant to this subsection (4), the assessor shall issue any written
determination regarding the objection and protest by the date specified in
section 39-5-122 (2).
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-5-123, amend
(1)(a) and (2) as follows:
39-5-123. Abstract of assessment or amended abstract of
assessment.
(1) (a) Upon conclusion of hearings by the county board of
equalization, as provided in article 8 of this title 39, the assessor shall
complete the assessment roll of all taxable property within the assessor's
county, and, no later than August 25 in each year or no later than November
21 in each year in any county that uses an alternate protest and appeal
procedure pursuant to section 39-5-122.7, the assessor shall prepare
therefrom three copies of the abstract of assessment and in person, and not
by deputy, shall subscribe the assessor's name, under oath, to the following
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-046

statement, which shall be a part of such abstract:
I, .............., the assessor of .............. county, Colorado,
do solemnly swear that in the assessment roll of such county
I have listed and valued all taxable property located therein
and that such property has been assessed for the current year
in the manner prescribed by law and that the foregoing
abstract of assessment is a true and correct compilation of
each schedule.
...................
(2) The assessor shall file, two copies IN AN ELECTRONIC OR PAPER
FORMAT, ONE COPY of the abstract of assessment with the administrator,
and, appended thereto, the assessor shall also file the aggregate valuation
for assessment of all taxable property in the county, each municipality, and
each school district within the county, by classes and subclasses, on a form
prescribed by the administrator.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-5-124, amend (1)
as follows:
39-5-124. Property tax administrator to examine abstract.
(1) When the abstract of assessment has been subscribed and sworn
to by the assessor and by the chairman of the board of county
commissioners, the assessor shall transmit, two copies IN ELECTRONIC OR
PAPER FORMAT, ONE COPY thereof to the administrator. and shall retain the
third copy for endorsement of the tax warrant thereon
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-8-107, amend (1)
as follows:
39-8-107. Hearings on appeal.
(1) (a) At the hearing upon a petition, the assessor or the assessor's
authorized representative shall be present and shall produce information to
support the basis and amount of the assessor's valuation of the property. The
board shall hear and consider all testimony and examine all exhibits
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-046

produced or introduced by either the petitioner or the assessor, with no
presumption in favor of any pending valuation, and may subpoena witnesses
to testify. THE PETITIONER SHALL PAY the costs of producing the petitioner's
witnesses, shall be paid by the petitioner and THE COUNTY SHALL PAY the
costs of producing the assessor's witnesses. shall be paid by the county On
the basis of the testimony produced and the exhibits introduced, the board
shall grant or deny the petition, in whole or in part, and shall notify the
petitioner and the assessor in writing.
(b) (I) If the board denies the petition, in whole or in part, such
written notice shall MUST inform the petitioner of the right to appeal within
the thirty-day period following the denial to the district court or the board
of assessment appeals pursuant to the provisions of section 39-8-108 (1) or
within the thirty-day period following the denial to submit the case to
arbitration pursuant to the provisions of section 39-8-108.5 NO LATER THAN
THE LATER OF:
(A) SEPTEMBER 1;
(B) DECEMBER 1, IN A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST
AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7; OR
(C) THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE ENTRY OF THE DENIAL, IF THE
PETITIONER WAS NOTIFIED OUTSIDE OF THE REGULAR NOTIFICATION
SCHEDULE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-5-121.
(II) Such notice shall MUST state that, if the appeal is to the board of
assessment appeals, the hearing before the board of assessment appeals
shall WILL be the last hearing at which testimony, exhibits, or any other type
of evidence may be introduced by either party and that, if there is an appeal
to the court of appeals pursuant to section 39-8-108 (2), the record from the
hearing before the board of assessment appeals and no new evidence shall
WILL be the basis for the court's decision. The phone number and address
of the board of assessment appeals shall MUST also be included on the
notice. The notice shall MUST also state, in general terms, how to pursue
arbitration and that, if a taxpayer submits the case to arbitration, the
decision reached under such process shall WILL be final and not subject to
review. If a referee heard the case, the board shall, at the written request of
any taxpayer or any agent of such taxpayer within seven working days after
receipt of said request, make available to the taxpayer or agent the referee's
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-046

findings and recommendations. At the board's election, the board may either
mail, fax, or send by electronic transmission such findings and
recommendations to the address, phone number, or electronic address
supplied by said taxpayer or agent. Upon receipt of such request, the board
shall notify the taxpayer or agent of the estimated cost of providing such
findings and recommendations, payment of which shall MUST be made prior
to providing such findings and recommendations. Upon providing such
findings and recommendations, the board may include a bill for the
reasonable cost above the estimated cost and up to the statutory maximum
which shall be IS due and payable upon receipt by the taxpayer or agent.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-8-108, amend (1)
as follows:
39-8-108. Decision - review - opportunity to submit case to
arbitration.
(1) (a) If the county board of equalization grants a petition, in whole
or in part, the assessor shall adjust the valuation accordingly; but, if the
petition is denied, in whole or in part, the petitioner may appeal the
valuation set by the assessor or, if the valuation is adjusted as a result of a
decision of the county board of equalization, the adjusted valuation to the
board of assessment appeals or to the district court of the county wherein
the petitioner's property is located for a trial de novo, or the petitioner may
submit the case to arbitration pursuant to the provisions of section
39-8-108.5. Such appeal or submission to arbitration shall MUST be taken
no later than THE LATER OF:
(I) SEPTEMBER 1;
(II) DECEMBER 1, IN A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST
AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7; OR
(III) Thirty days after the date such THE denial was mailed pursuant
to section 39-8-107 (2), IF THE PETITIONER WAS NOTIFIED OUTSIDE OF THE
REGULAR NOTIFICATION SCHEDULE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-5-121.
(b) Any decision rendered by the county board of equalization shall
MUST state that the petitioner has the right to appeal the decision of the
county board to the board of assessment appeals or to the district court of
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-046

the county wherein the petitioner's property is located or to submit the case
to arbitration and, to preserve such right, the time by which such appeal or
submission to arbitration must be made. Any request by a taxpayer for a
hearing before the board of assessment appeals shall MUST be accompanied
by a nonrefundable filing fee in an amount specified in section 39-2-125
(1)(h). In addition, any request by a taxpayer for a hearing before the board
of assessment appeals shall MUST be stamped with the date on which such
request was received by the board. All such requests shall be ARE presumed
to be on time unless the board can present evidence to show otherwise.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-8-108.5, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
39-8-108.5. Arbitration of property valuations - arbitrators -
qualifications - procedures.
(2) (a) (I) Within thirty days of the county board of equalization's
decision, Any taxpayer who plans to pursue arbitration shall notify the
board of his THE TAXPAYER'S intent NO LATER THAN THE LATER OF:
(A) SEPTEMBER 1;
(B) DECEMBER 1, IN A COUNTY THAT USES AN ALTERNATE PROTEST
AND APPEAL PROCEDURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-5-122.7; OR
(C) THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE COUNTY BOARD OF EQUALIZATION'S
DECISION, IF THE TAXPAYER WAS NOTIFIED OUTSIDE OF THE REGULAR
NOTIFICATION SCHEDULE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-5-121.
(II) The taxpayer and the county board of equalization shall select
an arbitrator from the list prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
within forty-five FIFTEEN days of the county board of equalization's decision
NOTICE OF THE TAXPAYER'S INTENT TO PURSUE ARBITRATION or within thirty
days from the date the list of arbitrators is made available in any given year,
whichever is later. In the absence of agreement by the taxpayer and the
county board of equalization within said specified time period, the district
court of the county in which the property is located shall select an arbitrator
from said list.
SECTION 18. Act subject to petition - effective date. Section
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-046

39-1-104.6, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 1 of this act,
section 39-1-113, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 3 of
this act, section 39-3-205, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section
8 of this act, section 39-3-206, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in
section 9 of this act, section 39-5-121, Colorado Revised Statutes, as
amended in section 10 of this act, section 39-5-122, Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 11 of this act, and section 39-5-122.7,
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 12 of this act take effect
January 1, 2027, and the remainder of this act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on
the day following the expiration of the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly; except that, if a referendum petition
is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against
this act or an item, section, or part of this act within such period, then the
act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people
at the general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will
take effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the
governor; except that section 39-1-104.6, Colorado Revised Statutes, as
amended in section 1 of this act, section 39-1-113, Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 3 of this act, section 39-3-205, Colorado
Revised Statutes, as amended in section 8 of this act, section 39-3-206,
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 9 of this act, section
39-5-121, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 10 of this act,
section 39-5-122, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 11 of
this act, and section 39-5-122.7, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-046

section 12 of this act take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-046